Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Children’s Proceedings.

Cross references. —

For court rules governing children’s proceedings, see Alaska Rules of Court, Child in Need of Aid Rules (CINA Rules) and Delinquency Rules.

Sec. 47.10.005.
Construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to

achieve the end that a child coming within the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter may receive the care, guidance, treatment, and control that will promote the child’s welfare and the parents’ participation in the upbringing of the child to the fullest extent consistent with the child’s best interests; and

follow the findings set out in AS

47.05.065

.

History.

(§ 16 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of act enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, added the paragraph (1) designation and paragraph (2), and in paragraph (1) added “achieve” at the beginning and added the language beginning “and the parents’ participation” to the end of the paragraph.

Sec. 47.10.010.
Jurisdiction; guardians and attorneys; support.

Proceedings relating to a child under 18 years of age residing or found in the state are governed by this chapter when the child is alleged to be or may be determined by the court to be a child in need of aid under AS

47.10.011

.

In a controversy concerning custody of a child under this chapter, the court may appoint a guardian of the person and property of a child, may appoint an attorney to represent the legal interests of the child, and may order support from either or both parents. Custody of a child may be given to the department and payment of support money to the department may be ordered by a court.

History.

(§ 4 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1961; am §§ 1, 2 ch 110 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am §§ 7, 8 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 39 SLA 1985; am § 17 ch 50 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 125 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 81 SLA 1995; am §§ 17, 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of the 1998 amendment of this section, see § 1,
ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendment to this section applies to

“(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after the effective date of this Act in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.011.
Children in need of aid.

Subject to AS

47.10.019

, the court may find a child to be a child in need of aid if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the child has been subjected to any of the following:

a parent or guardian has abandoned the child as described in AS

47.10.013

, and the other parent is absent or has committed conduct or created conditions that cause the child to be a child in need of aid under this chapter;

a parent, guardian, or custodian is incarcerated, the other parent is absent or has committed conduct or created conditions that cause the child to be a child in need of aid under this chapter, and the incarcerated parent has not made adequate arrangements for the child;

a custodian with whom the child has been left is unwilling or unable to provide care, supervision, or support for the child, and the whereabouts of the parent or guardian is unknown;

the child is in need of medical treatment to cure, alleviate, or prevent substantial physical harm or is in need of treatment for mental injury and the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian has knowingly failed to provide the treatment;

the child is habitually absent from home or refuses to accept available care and the child’s conduct places the child at substantial risk of physical or mental injury;

the child has suffered substantial physical harm, or there is a substantial risk that the child will suffer substantial physical harm, as a result of conduct by or conditions created by the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian or by the failure of the parent, guardian, or custodian to supervise the child adequately;

the child has suffered sexual abuse, or there is a substantial risk that the child will suffer sexual abuse, as a result of conduct by or conditions created by the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian or by the failure of the parent, guardian, or custodian to adequately supervise the child; if a parent, guardian, or custodian has actual notice that a person has been convicted of a sex offense against a minor within the past 15 years, is registered or required to register as a sex offender under AS 12.63, or is under investigation for a sex offense against a minor, and the parent, guardian, or custodian subsequently allows a child to be left with that person, this conduct constitutes prima facie evidence that the child is at substantial risk of being sexually abused;

conduct by or conditions created by the parent, guardian, or custodian have

resulted in mental injury to the child; or

placed the child at substantial risk of mental injury as a result of

a pattern of rejecting, terrorizing, ignoring, isolating, or corrupting behavior that would, if continued, result in mental injury; or

exposure to conduct by a household member, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, against another household member that is a crime under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.220

,

11.41.230(a)(1)

or (2), or

11.41.410

—

11.41.432

, an offense under a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to a crime under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.220

,

11.41.230(a)(1)

or (2), or

11.41.410

—

11.41.432

, an attempt to commit an offense that is a crime under AS 11.41.100 — 11.41.220 or 11.41.410 — 11.41.432, or an attempt to commit an offense under a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to a crime under AS 11.41.100 — 11.41.220 or 11.41.410 — 11.41.432; or

repeated exposure to conduct by a household member, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, against another household member that is a crime under AS

11.41.230(a)(3)

or

11.41.250

—

11.41.270

or an offense under a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to a crime under AS

11.41.230(a)(3)

or

11.41.250

—

11.41.270

;

conduct by or conditions created by the parent, guardian, or custodian have subjected the child or another child in the same household to neglect;

the parent, guardian, or custodian’s ability to parent has been substantially impaired by the addictive or habitual use of an intoxicant, and the addictive or habitual use of the intoxicant has resulted in a substantial risk of harm to the child; if a court has previously found that a child is a child in need of aid under this paragraph, the resumption of use of an intoxicant by a parent, guardian, or custodian within one year after rehabilitation is prima facie evidence that the ability to parent is substantially impaired and the addictive or habitual use of the intoxicant has resulted in a substantial risk of harm to the child as described in this paragraph;

the parent, guardian, or custodian has a mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or mental deficiency of a nature and duration that places the child at substantial risk of physical harm or mental injury;

the child has committed an illegal act as a result of pressure, guidance, or approval from the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian.

History.

(§ 18 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.

Sec. 47.10.013.
Abandonment.

For purposes of this chapter, the court may find abandonment of a child if a parent or guardian has shown a conscious disregard of parental responsibilities toward the child by failing to provide reasonable support, maintain regular contact, or provide normal supervision, considering the child’s age and need for care by an adult. Abandonment of a child also includes instances when the parent or guardian, without justifiable cause,

left the child with another person without provision for the child’s support and without meaningful communication with the child for a period of three months;

has made only minimal efforts to support and communicate with the child;

failed for a period of at least six months to maintain regular visitation with the child;

failed to participate in a suitable plan or program designed to reunite the parent or guardian with the child;

left the child without affording means of identifying the child and the child’s parent or guardian;

was absent from the home for a period of time that created a substantial risk of serious harm to a child left in the home;

failed to respond to notice of child protective proceedings; or

was unwilling to provide care, support, or supervision for the child.

For purposes of (a) of this section, a parent or guardian who is a victim of domestic violence, or who has a child in the parent’s or guardian’s care who is the victim of domestic violence, is considered to have justifiable cause to take an action or to fail to take an action that would otherwise be considered to be abandonment of a child under (a) of this section if the action or failure to act is necessary to protect the parent or guardian, or a child in the care of the parent or guardian, from further acts of domestic violence. However, a parent or guardian who initially had justifiable cause to act or fail to act as described in this subsection may be considered to have abandoned the child without justifiable cause for purposes of (a) of this section if the parent or guardian does not take reasonable steps to reunify with or provide care for the abandoned child after becoming secure from further acts of domestic violence or after providing that another child in the care of the parent or guardian is secure from further acts of domestic violence.

A parent who is immune from prosecution under AS

11.81.500

and chooses to surrender an infant shall surrender the infant in the manner described in this subsection. Surrendering the infant in the manner described in this subsection constitutes abandonment for purposes of this chapter. An infant’s parent is considered to have abandoned the infant safely, and, notwithstanding AS

25.20.030

and AS

47.10.120

, the parent’s legal duty to support the infant is extinguished if

the parent, without expressing an intent to return for the infant, leaves the infant in the physical custody of a person who is a

person the parent reasonably believes would provide for the health and safety of the infant and who would act appropriately to care for the infant;

peace officer, community health aide, physician, or hospital employee; or

person who is employed by or is a volunteer for a fire department or emergency medical service, if the person is acting within the scope of the person’s fire department or emergency medical service duties; and

there is no evidence the infant has been physically injured before abandonment.

A person to whom an infant is surrendered in the manner described in (c)(1)(B) or (C) of this section shall

act appropriately to care for the infant;

inform the parent that the parent may, but is not required to, answer any questions regarding the name, identity, and medical history of the infant and parents of the infant unless the parent chooses to contact the department under (3) of this subsection;

ask the parent if the parent wishes to relinquish the parent’s parental rights and release the infant for adoption; if the answer is affirmative, the person shall contact the department so that the parent can discuss that option with the department;

immediately notify the nearest office of the department that the infant has been surrendered in the manner described in (c) of this section.

An individual, agency, facility, or entity that receives an infant abandoned safely under (c) of this section is not liable for civil damages for failure to discharge the duties listed in (d) of this section.

A record regarding the surrender of an infant under (c) of this section is confidential and not subject to public inspection or copying under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 1 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 11, 2008, added subsections (c) through (f).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.

Sec. 47.10.014.
Neglect.

For purposes of this chapter, the court may find neglect of a child if the parent, guardian, or custodian fails to provide the child with adequate food, clothing, shelter, education, medical attention, or other care and control necessary for the child’s physical and mental health and development, though financially able to do so or offered financial or other reasonable means to do so.

History.

(§ 18 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal 2201.

Sec. 47.10.015.
Physical harm.

For the purposes of this chapter, the court may find physical harm to a child or substantial risk of physical harm to a child if

the child was the victim of an act described in AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.250

,

11.41.300

,

11.41.410

—

11.41.455

, or AS

11.51.100

and the physical harm occurred as a result of conduct by or conditions created by a parent, guardian, or custodian; or

a negligent act or omission by a parent, guardian, or custodian creates a substantial risk of injury to the child.

History.

(§ 18 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal 2201.

Sec. 47.10.019.
Limitations on determinations.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the court may not find a minor to be a child in need of aid under this chapter solely on the basis that the child’s family is poor, lacks adequate housing, or exhibits a lifestyle that is different from the generally accepted lifestyle standard of the community where the family lives. However, this section may not be construed to prevent a court from finding that a child is in need of aid if the child has been subjected to conduct or conditions described in AS

47.10.011

—

47.10.015

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For intent and purpose of the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that this section applies to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal 2201.

Sec. 47.10.020.
Investigation and petition.

Whenever circumstances subject a child to the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.10.005

—

47.10.142

, the court shall appoint a competent person or agency to make a preliminary inquiry and report for the information of the court to determine whether the best interests of the child require that further action be taken. The court shall make the appointment on its own motion or at the request of a person or agency having knowledge of the child’s circumstances. If, under this subsection, the court appoints a person or agency to make a preliminary inquiry and to report to it, or if the department is conducting an investigation of a report of child abuse or neglect, the court may issue any orders necessary to aid the person, the agency, or the department in its investigation or in making the preliminary inquiry and report. Upon receipt of the report under this subsection, the court may

close the matter without a court hearing;

determine whether the best interests of the child require that further action be taken; or

authorize the person or agency having knowledge of the facts of the case to file with the court a petition setting out the facts.

The petition and all subsequent pleadings shall be styled as follows: “In the matter of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., a child under 18 years of age.” The petition may be executed upon the petitioner’s information and belief and must be verified. It must include the following information:

the name, address, and occupation of the petitioner, together with the petitioner’s relationship to the child, and the petitioner’s interest in the matter;

the name, age, and address of the child;

a brief statement of the facts that bring the child within this chapter;

the names and addresses of the child’s parents;

the tribal affiliation, if known, of the child;

the name and address of the child’s guardian or of the person having control or custody of the child.

If the petitioner does not know a fact required in this section, the petitioner shall so state in the petition.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

Nothing in this section requires the department to obtain authorization from the court before

conducting an investigation of a report of child abuse or neglect; or

filing a petition.

History.

(§ 5 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am §§ 7, 8 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 98 SLA 1995; am §§ 18, 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 19, 20 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 7, 8 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (a) added the second sentence, in the third sentence added the language beginning “or if the department” to the end of the sentence, and inserted “under this subsection” in the last sentence; and added subsection (e).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.030.
Summons and custody of minor.

After a petition is filed and after further investigation that the court directs, if the person having custody or control of the minor has not appeared voluntarily, the court shall issue a summons that

recites briefly the substance of the petition;

clearly states that at the hearing it is possible that parental rights and responsibilities may be terminated forever and that the minor may at the hearing be committed to the department for possible adoption; and

directs the person having custody or control of the minor to appear personally in court with the minor at the place and at the time set forth in the summons.

In all cases under this chapter, the child, each parent, the tribe, foster parent or other out-of-home care provider, guardian, and guardian ad litem of the child and, subject to (d) and (e) of this section, each grandparent of the child shall be given notice adequate to give actual notice of the proceedings and the possibility of termination of parental rights and responsibilities, taking into account education and language differences that are known or reasonably ascertainable by the petitioner or the department. The notice of the hearing must contain all names by which the child has been identified. Notice shall be given in the manner appropriate under rules of civil procedure for the service of process in a civil action under Alaska law or in any manner the court by order directs. Proof of the giving of the notice shall be filed with the court before the petition is heard. The court may also subpoena the parent of the child, or any other person whose testimony may be necessary at the hearing. A subpoena or other process may be served by a person authorized by law to make the service, and, where personal service cannot be made, the court may direct that service of process be in a manner appropriate under rules of civil procedure for the service of process in a civil action under Alaska law or in any manner the court directs.

If the minor is in such condition or surroundings that the minor’s welfare requires the immediate assumption of custody by the court, the court may order, by endorsement upon the summons, that the officer serving the summons shall at once take the minor into custody and make the temporary placement of the minor that the court directs.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the department shall give advance written notice of all court hearings in a child’s case to a grandparent of the child if

the grandparent has contacted the department, provided evidence acceptable to the department of being the child’s grandparent, requested notice about the hearings in the child’s case, and provided the department with a current mailing address; or

the department is aware that the child has a grandparent and the grandparent’s mailing address is on file with the department.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, the department is not required to give advance notice to a grandparent about hearings in a child’s case if the grandparent

has been convicted of a crime in which the child was the victim; or

is prohibited by a court order from having contact with the child.

History.

(§ 6 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 9 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 21 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 43 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1998 amendments to subsection (b) on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 70, ch. 99, SLA 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the effect of the 2001 amendments on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules 3, 7, 10, 15, 17, and 19, see § 6, ch. 43, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.040.
Release of minor. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law as to a child in need of aid, see AS 47.10.080(c)(2); as to an alleged delinquent minor, see AS 47.12.080.]

Sec. 47.10.050.
Appointment of guardian ad litem or attorney.

Whenever in the course of proceedings instituted under this chapter it appears to the court that the welfare of a child will be promoted by the appointment of an attorney to represent the child, the court may make the appointment. If it appears to the court that the welfare of a child in the proceeding will be promoted by the appointment of a guardian ad litem, the court shall make the appointment. Appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney shall be made under the terms of AS

25.24.310

.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 8 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 167 SLA 1975; am §§ 11, 12 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For appointment of counsel, see CINA Rule 12; for guardians ad litem, see CINA Rule 11.

Administrative Code. —

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to subsection (a) apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.060.
Waiver of jurisdiction. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law as to an alleged delinquent minor, see AS 47.12.100.]

Sec. 47.10.070.
Hearings.

The court may conduct the hearing on the petition in an informal manner. The court shall give notice of the hearing to the department, and it may send a representative to the hearing. The court shall also transmit a copy of the petition to the department. The department shall send notice of the hearing to the persons for whom notice is required under AS

47.10.030(b)

and to each grandparent of the child entitled to notice under AS

47.10.030(d)

. The department and the persons to whom the department must send notice of the hearing are entitled to be heard at the hearing. Except as provided in (c) of this section, and unless prohibited by federal or state law, court order, or court rule, a hearing is open to the public.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the following hearings in child-in-need-of-aid cases are closed to the public:

the initial court hearing after the filing of a petition to commence the child-in-need-of-aid case;

a hearing following the initial hearing in which a parent, child, or other party to the case is present but has not had an opportunity to obtain legal representation;

a hearing, or a part of a hearing, for which the court issues a written order finding that allowing the hearing, or part of the hearing, to be open to the public would reasonably be expected to

stigmatize or be emotionally damaging to a child;

inhibit a child’s testimony in that hearing;

disclose matters otherwise required to be kept confidential by state or federal statute or regulation, court order, or court rule; or

interfere with a criminal investigation or proceeding or a criminal defendant’s right to a fair trial in a criminal proceeding; before ruling on a request under this subparagraph, the court shall give notice and an opportunity to be heard to the state or a municipal agency that is assigned to the criminal investigation or to the prosecuting attorney.

If a hearing, or part of a hearing, in a child-in-need-of-aid case is not closed under (c) of this section, the court shall hear in camera any information offered regarding the location, or readily leading to the location, of a parent, child, or other party to the case who is a victim of domestic violence or whose safety or welfare may be endangered by public release of the information. Access to testimony heard in camera under this subsection is limited to the court and authorized court personnel.

The grandparents of the child and an out-of-home care provider may attend hearings that are otherwise closed to the public under (c) of this section. However, the court shall limit the presence of these persons in a hearing closed to the public to the time during which the person’s testimony is being given if the court determines that the limitation is necessary under (c)(3) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person attending a hearing open to the public may not disclose a name, picture, or other information that would readily lead to the identification of a child who is the subject of the child-in-need-of-aid case. At the beginning of the hearing, the court shall issue an order specifying the restrictions necessary to comply with this subsection. If a person violates the order, the court may impose any appropriate sanction, including contempt and closure of any further hearings to the person.

History.

(§ 10(1) art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1966; am § 53 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 57 SLA 1991; am §§ 19, 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 23 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 2001; am §§ 9, 10 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1998 amendments to subsection (a) on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see § 70, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For the effect of the 2001 amendments on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules 3, 7, 10, 15, 17, and 19, see § 6, ch. 43, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the text of Rule 3(c), Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, permitting attendance of a grandparent or out-of-home care provider at a hearing, as authorized by the 2005 enactment of (e) of this section, see § 51, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the text of Rule 3(f), Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, allowing general public attendance at a hearing, as authorized by the 2005 amendment of (a) of this section, see § 52, ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (a) deleted the former last two sentences and added the present last sentence; and added subsections (c)-(f).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to subsection (a) apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

Section 61(a), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (a) and addition of (c) — (f) of this section “have the effect of changing Rule 3, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules of Procedure, by allowing members of the public to attend court hearings except in certain circumstances.”

Under § 62(a), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the amendments to Rule 3, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules of Procedure, that relate to the 2005 amendments of this section, apply “to hearings that are conducted on or after July 1, 2005.”
Under § 62(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendments of and additions to this section apply “to all proceedings and hearings conducted on or after July 1, 2005.”

Under § 62(c), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendment of and addition to this section “apply to all information, records, and files created on or after July 1, 2005; however, if a file contains information and records that were created before July 1, 2005, that information and those records retain the confidentiality that they had under the law on June 30, 2005.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.072.
Access to hearing by victim. [Repealed, § 23 ch 57 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 47.10.075.
Young adult advisory panels. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]